Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62J.88, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Technical assistance; legal services. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of commerce must provide technical assistance to the advisory council. new text end new text begin (b) The attorney general must provide legal services to the advisory council. new text end